Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-701
Fiscal year; commencement.

The fiscal year of each city of the second class and village and of any public utility of a city of the second class or village commences on October 1 and extends through the following September 30 except as provided in the Municipal Proprietary Function Act.

Laws 1879, § 85, p. 225;

R.S.1913, § 5181;

C.S.1922, § 4368;

Laws 1927, c. 46, § 1, p. 194;

C.S.1929, § 17-566;

R.S.1943, § 17-701;

Laws 1967, c. 78, § 1, p. 248;

Laws 1969, c. 257, § 12, p. 937;

Laws 1995, LB 194, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 216.

Municipal Proprietary Function Act, see section 18-2801.